DI-110 DIAGNOSTICS - ABS&VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) &

BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

DI6XU-01

DTC C 1257 / 57 Power Supply Drive Circuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area
* Battery
C1257/57 When malfunctioninside ECU is detected. * Power source circuit
*ABS&BA&TRC&VSCECU
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DIAGNOSTICS - ABS&VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) & DI-111
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Checkbattery voltage.

OK:
Voltage: 10 - 14V

NG> Check and repair the charging system.
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DI-112 DIAGNOSTICS - ABS&VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) &
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

2 | Check voltage of the ECU IG power source.

Incaseofusingthehand -heldtester.

PREPARATION:

(a) Connectthehand -heldtestertothe DLCS.

(b) Turntheignition switch ON and push the hand -heldtester main switch ON.

(c) Selectthe DATALIST mode onthe hand -heldtester.

CHECK:

Checkthe voltage condition output fromthe ECU displayed onthe hand -heldtester.
OK:

”Normal” is displayed.

Incaseofnotusingthehand -heldtester:
ON PREPARATION:
GND2,, - Remove ABS & BA & TRC & VSC ECU with connectors still con-
GND1 IG1 GND3 nected.
G i (@) Turn the ignition switch ON.
\M/V (b) Measure voltage between terminals IG1 and GND of ABS
G(N)D4/\ " & BA & TRC & VSC ECU connector.
Q// - o Voltage:
F09165 ge:10-14V

ABS & BA & TRC & VSC ECU.

0K> Turn ignition switch OFF, check and replace

@

3 | Check continuity between terminal GND of ABS & BA & TRC & VSC ECU connec-
tor and body ground.

CHECK:
Measure resistance betweenterminal GND of ABS &BA & TRC
& VSC ECU connector and body ground.
OK:
Resistance: 1 Q orless

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.
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DIAGNOSTICS - ABS & VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) &

DI-113
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

4CHeck ECU -IGfuse.
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PREPARATION:
Remove ECU -I1Gfusefromthe cowlside J/B LH.
CHECK:
Check continuityof ECU -1Gfuse.
OK:
Continuity

components connectedtoECU -IGfuse (See at-

NG Check for short circuit in all the harness and
tached wiring diagram).

tery (See page IN-35).

Check for open circuit in harness and connector between ABS & BA & TRC & VSC ECU and bat-
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